Maryland, session 2025, SB0662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–104.
(a) To be considered a restaurant, an establishment shall meet the requirements of
this section.
(b) An establishment shall have average daily receipts from the sale of food that
are at least 40% of its total daily receipts.

SENATE BILL 662 3
(c) The Board may not consider as food an ingredient or a garnish used with or
mixed with an alcoholic beverage that is prepared and served for on–premises consumption.
(d) (1) The Board may waive the food requirement specified under subsection
(b) of this section for a restaurant:
(I) owned and operated by a nonprofit organization in the area
bounded by South Ellwood Avenue on the west, Bank Street on the north, South Bouldin
Street on the east, and Fleet Street on the south; OR
(II) OPERATED IN THE AREA BOUNDED BY SOUTH EDEN STREET
ON THE WEST, BANK STREET ON THE NORTH, SOUTH SPRING STREET ON THE EAST,
AND EASTERN AVENUE ON THE SOUTH.
(2) For a license that meets the qualifications under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Board may approve an expansion of the licensed premises onto a
noncontiguous property with a second separate use permit issued by the City, if the second
separate use permit specifically refers to the alcoholic beverages license at the primary
location.
12–1406.
(b) If a community association and an applicant for the issuance or renewal of [a
Class B, B–D–7, or D] AN alcoholic beverages license have entered into a memorandum of
understanding that expressly acknowledges the authority of the Board under this article, the
Board may make the issuance or renewal of the license conditional on the substantial
compliance of the applicant with the memorandum of understanding.
12–1603.
(a) The alcoholic beverages districts described in this section at all times are
coterminous with the legislative districts in the Legislative Districting Plan of 2022.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Board may not issue a
new license in:
(1) the 40th alcoholic beverages district;
(2) the 41st alcoholic beverages district;
(3) the 43rd alcoholic beverages district;
(4) the 44th alcoholic beverages district; and
(5) the 45th alcoholic beverages district.

SENATE BILL 662
(c) The Board may issue:
(17) a Class A–7 beer, wine, and liquor license in the 1200 block of West North
Avenue in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Penn North Community Association;
(ii) alcoholic beverages are sold only as part of a gift basket or floral
arrangement; and
(iii) the applicant does not hold or apply for a Class BWLT beer, wine,
and liquor (on–premises) tasting license; [and]
(18) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license for a restaurant on the even side
of the 400 block of West 29th Street in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Greater Remington Improvement Association; and
(ii) the Board waives a minimum seating requirement under item
(1)(ii)2 of this subsection; AND
(19) A CLASS C BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ON THE ODD SIDE
OF THE 800 BLOCK OF NORTH HOWARD STREET IN THE 40TH ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CONVERT THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LICENSE CLASS;
(II) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT TRANSFER THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LOCATION;
(III) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE SERVED ONLY TO PATRONS
INDOORS;
(IV) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SALES BEGIN NOT EARLIER THAN
10 A.M. AND END NOT LATER THAN 9 P.M.;
(V) THE APPLICANT PROVIDES NOT MORE THAN TWO 12–OUNCE
OFFERINGS OF BEER, TWO 6–OUNCE OFFERINGS OF WINE BY THE GLASS, OR TWO
1.5–OUNCE OFFERINGS OF LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION BY A PATRON
WHILE THE PATRON IS PROVIDED A BARBERING SERVICE REGULATED UNDER TITLE
4, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 662 5
(VI) THE BOARD WAIVES ANY REQUIREMENTS THAT SALES CAN
BE MADE ONLY TO MEMBERS AND THE GUESTS OF MEMBERS; AND
(VII) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE MOUNT VERNON – BELVEDERE ASSOCIATION.
12–1605.
(b) (5) For an establishment that is within 300 feet of the nearest point of a
place of worship or school, the Board may issue a license in or approve the transfer of a
license into the area specified in paragraph (1)(ii)6 of this subsection only if the license
holder has received a letter of support from [a] THE place of worship or school that is within
the bounded area AND HAS ENTERED INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH A COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION THAT IS WITHIN THE BOUNDED AREA.
Chapter 1026 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) Notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises on the 2800 block of O’Donnell Street
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2024, for the purpose of completing a
transfer of ownership at the same location.
(2) Notwithstanding § 12–1604.1 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a holder of a Class D beer and light wine license on the 3200 block of Eastern
Avenue may apply to the Board to convert to a Class D beer, wine, and liquor license if the
license holder meets each requirement in § 12–1604.1 except for the requirement to
maintain average daily receipts from the sale of food that are at least 51% of the total daily
receipts.
(3) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises in the 1600 block of Eastern Avenue
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2025, for the purpose of completing a
transfer of ownership and transfer of location to a premises in the 600 block of South
Caroline Street.
(4) (i) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article, a Class B license issued for a premises in the 3500 block of Boston Street
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, [2025] 2028, for the purpose of
completing a transfer of ownership and a transfer of location to a premises in the 3600 block
of Boston Street.
(ii) If a Class B license transferred to the 3600 block of Boston Street
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph was originally issued as a Class B–D–7 license,

SENATE BILL 662
the license holder may apply to the Board to convert the Class B license back to a Class
B–D–7 license.
(5) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises in the 600 block of South Luzerne
Avenue shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2025, for the purpose of being
renewed to the current license year by the licensee.
(b) The Board may not authorize the transfer of a license in ward 24, precinct 5
to a person or a location that has received and retained funding awarded under a legislative
bond initiative.
Chapter 1027 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) Notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises on the 2800 block of O’Donnell Street
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2024, for the purpose of completing a
transfer of ownership at the same location.
(2) Notwithstanding § 12–1604.1 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a holder of a Class D beer and light wine license on the 3200 block of Eastern
Avenue may apply to the Board to convert to a Class D beer, wine, and liquor license if the
license holder meets each requirement in § 12–1604.1 except for the requirement to
maintain average daily receipts from the sale of food that are at least 51% of the total daily
receipts.
(3) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises in the 1600 block of Eastern Avenue
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2025, for the purpose of completing a
transfer of ownership and transfer of location to a premises in the 600 block of South
Caroline Street.
(4) (i) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article, a Class B license issued for a premises in the 3500 block of Boston Street
shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, [2025] 2028, for the purpose of
completing a transfer of ownership and a transfer of location to a premises in the 3600 block
of Boston Street.
(ii) If a Class B license transferred to the 3600 block of Boston Street
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph was originally issued as a Class B–D–7 license,
the license holder may apply to the Board to convert the Class B license back to a Class
B–D–7 license.
(5) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, a Class B–D–7 license issued for a premises in the 600 block of South Luzerne

SENATE BILL 662 7
Avenue shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2025, for the purpose of being
renewed to the current license year by the licensee.
(b) The Board may not authorize the transfer of a license in ward 24, precinct 5
to a person or a location that has received and retained funding awarded under a legislative
bond initiative.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
a Class D 6–day beer, wine, and liquor license issued for a premises on the 200 block of East
Lexington Street shall be considered unexpired until the end of June 30, 2026, for the
purpose of completing a transfer of ownership at the same location, provided the license
holder received a letter of support from the Downtown Partnership of Baltimore.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding §§ 12–1703 and 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages
and Cannabis Article, five Class B beer, wine, and liquor licenses issued for restaurant
premises at Harborplace and expired between January 1, 2021, and January 1, 2025, shall
be considered unexpired until the end of June 30, 2030, for the purpose of completing a
transfer of ownership at the same location.
(2) Notwithstanding § 12–1703 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, the most recent license holder shall retain liability for any unpaid personal property
taxes due to Baltimore City or to the State.
(3) The Board may not:
(i) require a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license issued under this
subsection:
1. to have a minimum capital investment; or
2. to maintain a minimum or maximum seating amount;
(ii) authorize the transfer of a license issued under this subsection to
another location; and
(iii) require the most recent license holder to complete a Transfer
Authorization or Affidavit of Compliance to complete a transfer of ownership in accordance
with this subsection.
(4) At the end of June 30, 2030, a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license
issued under this subsection shall expire and be nonrenewable.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and 1 month

SENATE BILL 662
and, at the end of June 30, 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.